Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6178XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2121 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards of 3 section 256.11 relating to the social studies curriculum for 4 grades seven through twelve. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0u. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 256.11 relating to the social studies 9 curriculum for grades seven through twelve in the same manner 10 as a school district. 11 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, 12 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 (2) Social studies, including instruction related to civics 14 and United States government . The instruction related to 15 civics and United States government shall be at least one-half 16 semester, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, during grade 17 seven and grade eight. 18 Sec. 4. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. (1) Five units of the social studies including 21 instruction in voting statutes and procedures, voter 22 registration requirements, the use of paper ballots and voting 23 systems in the election process, and the method of acquiring 24 and casting an absentee ballot. All students shall complete 25 a minimum of one-half one unit of civics and United States 26 government and one unit of United States history. 27 (2) The one-half one unit of civics and United States 28 government shall include the all of the following: 29 (a) The voting procedure as described in this lettered 30 paragraph and section 280.9A . The government instruction shall 31 also include a 32 (b) A study of the Constitution of the United States and the 33 Bill of Rights contained in the Constitution and an assessment 34 of a studentâs knowledge of the Constitution and the Bill of 35 -1- LSB 6178XS (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2121 Rights. 1 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school years 2 beginning on or after July 1, 2028. 3